Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Department of Vehicle Regulation

281.595.
Department of motor transportation.
[Repealed.]

281.596.
Divisions permitted with prior approval.

With prior approval of the secretary and pursuant to KRS Chapter 12, the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall be divided into such divisions as the commissioner of vehicle regulation may deem necessary to perform the duties and functions of the department. Each division shall perform the duties assigned to it by the commissioner of vehicle regulation and shall be headed by a director who shall act under the direction and supervision of the commissioner of vehicle regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 18.

281.600.
Administrative functions and powers of department — Farm equipment exempt from federal regulation — Other motor vehicles exempt from federal regulation — Department of Kentucky State Police to administer motor carrier safety management audit program.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall exercise all administrative functions of the state in relation to motor carrier transportation as defined in this chapter, and shall apply, as far as practicable, the administrative and judicial interpretations of acts administered by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration and other federal agencies under the United States Department of Transportation. It shall have the right to regulate motor carriers as provided in this chapter and, to that end, may establish reasonable requirements with respect to continuous and adequate service of transportation, systems of accounts, records and reports, preservation of records, and safety of operation and equipment. It may issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum and orders of personal attendance of witnesses, and production of pertinent records for any proceeding before it, and permit the taking of depositions, all in accord with the Rules of Civil Procedure, and it shall have the power to promulgate administrative regulations as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The department shall have the authority to promulgate regulations regarding safety requirements for motor vehicles and the method of operation, including the adoption of any of the federal motor carrier safety regulations and any motor vehicle operating contrary to safety regulations shall be in violation of this section.

The provisions established by the Federal Highway Administration in Title 49, Part 393 of the United States Code of Federal Regulations shall not apply to:

A motor vehicle or its towed unit having a fertilizer spreader attachment permanently mounted thereon, having a gross weight not to exceed thirty-six thousand (36,000) pounds, and used only for the transportation of bulk fertilizer; or

A farm-wagon-type tank trailer of not more than two thousand (2,000) gallon capacity used during liquid fertilizer season as a field storage tank supplying fertilizer to a field applicator, and moved on a public highway for the purpose of bringing fertilizer from a local source of supply to a farm or field, or from one (1) farm or field to another, provided that the vehicle is being operated solely in intrastate transportation.

The provisions established by the Federal Highway Administration in 49 C.F.R. sec. 390.21 and 49 C.F.R. pts. 391, 393, 395, and 396 shall not apply to a motor vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(4)(a)1., or its towed unit, if:

The vehicle is not engaged in interstate commerce;

The vehicle is engaged in farming or agricultural related activities; and

The gross vehicle weight, gross vehicle weight rating, gross vehicle combination weight, or gross vehicle combination weight rating of the vehicle and its towed unit is twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds or less.

The provisions established by the Federal Highway Administration in 49 C.F.R. secs. 391.41 to 391.49 and 49 C.F.R. pt. 395 shall not apply to a motor vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(3)(b), or its towed unit, if:

The vehicle is not engaged in interstate commerce;

The vehicle is not transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded in accordance with 49 C.F.R. pt. 172;

The vehicle is not designed or used to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver; and

The gross vehicle weight, gross vehicle weight rating, gross vehicle combination weight, or gross vehicle combination weight rating of the vehicle and its towed unit is twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds or less.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall exercise all administrative functions of the state pertaining to the motor carrier safety management audit program. This program shall be administered according to the provisions of the Federal Motor Carriers Safety Act and the federal regulations promulgated under that Act.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 6; 1962, ch. 63, § 2; 1964, ch. 95, § 5; 1990, ch. 466, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 2006, ch. 72, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 75, § 16, effective June 25, 2009; 2011, ch. 88, § 2, effective March 16, 2011; 2013, ch. 81, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 19, § 3, effective June 24, 2015.

281.602.
Filing lien notice.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall have the authority to file the notice of a lien with the county clerk prescribed in KRS

131.515

with respect to any license tax, excise tax, motor fuel tax, or other motor vehicular tax or fee administered by the department.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 63, § 12; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 384, § 463, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 164, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 10, § 66, effective January 1, 2010; 2015 ch. 19, § 4, effective June 24, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Motor carrier gasoline taxes, reciprocity in furnishing information, KRS

138.725

.

281.604.
Assessment of AVIS reprogramming costs required due to KRS 186.072 and 186.073. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 176, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.605.
Exemption of motor vehicles used for certain purposes.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply, except as to safety regulations, to:

Motor vehicles used as school buses and while engaged in the transportation of students, under the supervision and control and at the direction of school authorities;

Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, motor vehicles, regardless of ownership, used exclusively:

For the transportation of agricultural and dairy products, including fruit, livestock, meats, fertilizer, wood, lumber, cotton, products of grove or orchard, poultry, and eggs, while owned by the producer of the products, including landlord where the relation of landlord and tenant or landlord and cropper is involved, from the farm to a market, warehouse, dairy, or mill, or from one (1) market, warehouse, dairy, or mill to another market, warehouse, dairy, or mill. As used in this paragraph and in paragraph (b) of this subsection, “livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, or any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;

For the transportation of agricultural and dairy products, livestock, farm machinery, feed, fertilizer, and other materials and supplies essential to farm operation, from market or shipping terminal to farm;

For both the purposes described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection;

For the transportation of agricultural and dairy products from farm to regularly organized fairs and exhibits and return; or

Motor vehicles used for the transportation of fly ash, in bags, sacks, or other containers, the aggregate weight of which does not exceed ten thousand (10,000) pounds; or bottom ash, waste ash, sludge, and pozatec which is being removed from the premises of a power generator facility for the purpose of disposal;

Motor vehicles used exclusively as church buses and while operated in the transportation of persons to and from a church or place of worship or for other religious work under the supervision and control and at the direction of church authorities;

Motor vehicles used exclusively for the transportation of property belonging to a nonprofit cooperative association or its members where the vehicle is owned or leased exclusively by the association;

Motor vehicles owned in whole or in part by any person and used by such person to transport commodities of which such person is the bona fide owner, lessee, consignee, or bailee; provided, however, that such transportation is for the purpose of sale, lease, rent, or bailment, and is an incidental adjunct to an established private business owned and operated by such person within the scope and in furtherance of any primary commercial enterprise of such person other than the business of transportation of property for hire;

Motor vehicles used in pick-up or delivery service within a city or within a city and its commercial area for a carrier by rail;

Motor vehicles used exclusively for the transportation of coal from the point at which such coal is mined to a railhead or tipple where the railhead or tipple is located at a point not more than fifty (50) air miles from the point at which the coal is mined;

Motor vehicles used as ambulances in transporting wounded, injured, or sick animals or as ambulances as defined in KRS

311A.010

;

Motor vehicles used by transit authorities as created and defined in KRS Chapter 96A except as required by KRS

96A.170

. Vehicles operated under the authority and direct responsibility of such transit authorities, through contractual agreement, shall be included within this exemption, without regard to the legal ownership of the vehicles, but only for such times as they are operated under the authority and responsibility of the transit authority;

Motor vehicles having a seating capacity of fifteen (15) or fewer passengers and while transporting persons between their places of residence, on the one hand, and, on the other, their places of employment, provided the driver himself or herself is on his way to or from his or her place of employment, and further provided that any person who operates or controls the operation of vehicles hereunder of which said person is the owner or lessee, and any spouse of said person and any partnership or corporation with said person or his or her spouse having an interest therein doing such, shall be eligible to so operate an aggregate number of not more than one (1) vehicle on other than a nonprofit basis;

Motor vehicles used to transport cash letters, data processing material, instruments, or documents, regardless of the ownership of any of said cash letters, data processing material, instruments, or documents;

Motor vehicles operated by integrated intermodal small package carriers who provide intermodal-air-and-ground-transportation. For the purposes of this section, “integrated intermodal small package carrier” shall mean an air carrier holding a certificate or qualifying as an indirect air carrier that undertakes, by itself or through a company affiliated through common ownership, to provide intermodal-air-and- ground-transportation, and “intermodal-air-and-ground-transportation” shall mean transportation involving the carriage of articles weighing not more than one hundred fifty (150) pounds by aircraft or other forms of transportation, including by motor vehicle, wholly within the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The incidental or occasional use of aircraft in transporting packages or articles shall not constitute an integrated intermodal operation within the meaning of this section;

Motor vehicles operated pursuant to a grant of funds in furtherance of and governed by 49

U.S.C. secs. 5310

or 5311, including all amendments, and whose operators have jurisdictions and services approved annually by the Transportation Cabinet in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Title VI;

Motor vehicles used to transport children to educational events or conservation camps run by, or sponsored by, the Department of Fish and Wildlife;

Motor vehicles used to transport children to events or camps run by, or sponsored by, the Kentucky Sheriffs Association; or

Motor vehicles used in the transportation of persons who are eighteen (18) years of age or older, if the motor vehicles are owned by a nonprofit organization or being used on behalf of a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Motor vehicles owned and operated by a nonprofit organization that are exempt under this subsection shall be subject to liability insurance coverage as established by KRS

281.655

.

Motor vehicles owned privately but operated on behalf of a nonprofit organization that are exempt under this subsection shall be subject to liability insurance coverage as established by KRS

304.39-110

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 8, effective June 15, 1950; 1954, ch. 188, § 2; 1958, ch. 123, § 1; 1958, ch. 130, § 6; 1962, ch. 96, § 1; 1964, ch. 95, § 6; 1968, ch. 152, § 135; 1972, ch. 269, § 1; 1974, ch. 138, § 3; 1978, ch. 62, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 232, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 349, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 238, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 403, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 448, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 233, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 607, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 343, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 211, § 38, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 318, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 146, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2009, ch. 19, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2015 ch. 19, § 5, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 129, § 28, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 225, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2008). The internal numbering of subsection (16) of this section has been altered by the Reviser of Statutes from the numbering in 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 146, sec. 1, under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

281.607.
Recognition of corporate limits and population of city government units prior to merger into urban-county government — Recognition of boundaries of service districts. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 142, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

Compiler's Notes

This section (Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 142, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2)) was repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.610.
Regulation of interstate commerce.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to interstate commerce, except insofar as such application is in conflict with any provision of the Constitution of the United States or the Acts of Congress.

The commissioner may grant a certificate for the transportation of passengers or property for compensation in interstate commerce, and may regulate such interstate commerce under the authority of and in accordance with the provisions of any Act of Congress vesting in or delegating to the commissioner such authority as an agency of the United States government. The commissioner may notify the proper department of the federal government of his assent to the requirements and conditions of such Act of Congress in regard to interstate commerce by motor vehicle.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 9; 2015 ch. 19, § 6, effective June 24, 2015.

281.612.
Authorization for joining interstate compact for overdimensional permits. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 448, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.